Wisconsin, session 2025, AB992.
do enact as follows:AB992,14Section 1. 227.11 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB992,2,21227.11 (5) An agency may not avoid the prohibition under s. 227.139 (1) by 2doing any of the following:AB992,2,53(a) Promulgating multiple rules that impose or otherwise result in the same 4or similar standards, requirements, or thresholds, if those multiple rules could have 5been promulgated as a single rule.AB992,2,86(b) Promulgating separate, serial rules or separate, interdependent rules, if 7those separate rules are related to the same subject and could have been 8promulgated as a single rule.AB992,29Section 2. 227.137 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB992,2,1410227.137 (3) (b) 2. A determination, for purposes of the requirement under s. 11227.139, as to whether $10,000,000 $4,000,000 or more in implementation and 12compliance costs are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to 13businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a 14result of the proposed rule.AB992,315Section 3. 227.139 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB992,3,216227.139 (1) If an economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (2), a 17revised economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4), or an independent 18economic impact analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. 19indicates that $10,000,000 $4,000,000 or more in implementation and compliance 20costs are reasonably expected to be incurred by or passed along to businesses, local 21governmental units, and individuals over any 2-year period as a result of the 22proposed rule, the agency proposing the rule shall stop work on the proposed rule 23and may not continue promulgating the proposed rule notwithstanding any 1provision authorizing or requiring the agency to promulgate the proposed rule, 2except as authorized under sub. (2).AB992,43Section 4. 227.139 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB992,3,164227.139 (2) (b) If an agency is prohibited from promulgating a rule under sub. 5(1), the agency may modify the proposed rule, if the modification is germane to the 6subject matter of the proposed rule, to address the implementation and compliance 7costs of the proposed rule. If the agency modifies a proposed rule under this 8paragraph, the agency shall prepare a revised economic impact analysis under s. 9227.137 (4). Following the modification, the agency may continue with the rule-10making process as provided in this subchapter if the revised economic impact 11analysis prepared by the agency indicates, and any independent economic impact 12analysis prepared under s. 227.137 (4m) or 227.19 (5) (b) 3. subsequent to the 13agency’s modification also indicates, that $10,000,000 $4,000,000 or more in 14implementation and compliance costs are not reasonably expected to be incurred by 15or passed along to businesses, local governmental units, and individuals over any 2-16year period as a result of the proposed rule.AB992,517Section 5. 227.40 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB992,3,2318227.40 (4) (a) In any proceeding pursuant to this section for judicial review of 19a rule or guidance document, the court shall declare the rule or guidance document 20invalid if it finds that it violates constitutional provisions or exceeds the statutory 21authority of the agency or, was promulgated or adopted without compliance with 22statutory rule-making or adoption procedures, or was promulgated in violation of s. 23227.11 (5).AB992,624Section 6. Initial applicability.AB992,4,21(1) This act first applies to a proposed rule whose statement of scope is 2presented for approval under s. 227.135 (2) on the effective date of this subsection.AB992,4,33